North Carolina statutes. Chapter 31A. Acts Barring Property Rights.
Article 1. Rights of Spouse.

§ 31A-1.
Acts barring rights of spouse.

The following persons shall lose the rights specified in subsection (b) of this section:

A spouse from whom or by whom an absolute divorce or marriage annulment has been obtained or from whom a divorce from bed and board has been obtained; or

A spouse who voluntarily separates from the other spouse and lives in adultery and such has not been condoned; or

A spouse who wilfully and without just cause abandons and refuses to live with the other spouse and is not living with the other spouse at the time of such spouse’s death; or

A spouse who obtains a divorce the validity of which is not recognized under the laws of this State; or

A spouse who knowingly contracts a bigamous marriage.

The rights lost as specified in subsection (a) of this section shall be as follows:

All rights of intestate succession in the estate of the other spouse;

All right to claim or succeed to a homestead in the real property of the other spouse;

All right to petition for an elective share of the estate of the other spouse and take either the elective intestate share provided or the life interest in lieu thereof;

All right to any year’s allowance in the personal property of the other spouse;

All right to administer the estate of the other spouse; and

Any rights or interests in the property of the other spouse which by a settlement before or after marriage were settled upon the offending spouse solely in consideration of the marriage.

Any act specified in subsection (a) of this section may be pleaded in bar of any action or proceeding for the recovery of such rights, interests or estate as set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

The spouse not at fault may sell and convey his or her real and personal property without the joinder of the other spouse, and thereby bar the other spouse of all right, title and interest therein in the following instances:

During the continuance of a separation arising from a divorce from bed and board as specified in subsection (a)(1) of this section, or

During the continuance of a separation arising from adultery as specified in subsection (a)(2) of this section, or during the continuance of a separation arising from an abandonment as specified in subsection (a)(3) of this section, or

When a divorce is granted as specified in subsection (a)(4) of this section, or a bigamous marriage contracted as specified in subsection (a)(5) of this section.

History.

1961, c. 210, s. 1; 1965, c. 850; 2000-178, s. 6.

Cross References.

As to right of elective share, see

G.S. 30-3.1

et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For article discussing this Chapter, section by section, see 40 N.C.L. Rev. 175 (1962).

For note on forfeitures of property rights by slayers, see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 448 (1976).